Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0959.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 280. As used in this section and sections 281 to 285:
(a) "Class I carrier", "class II carrier", and "class III
carrier" mean those terms as defined in 49 CFR part 1201.
(b) "Defect" includes hot wheel bearings, hot wheels,
defective bearings that are detected through acoustics, dragging
equipment, excessive height or weight, shifted loads, low hoses,
rail temperature, and wheel condition.
(c) "Office" means the office of rail in the state
JJR S05151'25 (S-2) gcsk2y


transportation department.
(d) "Wayside detector system" means an electronic device or a
series of connected devices that scan passing trains, rolling
stock, on-track equipment, and component equipment and parts for
defects.
Sec. 281. (1) The office shall work with each railroad that
does business in this state to ensure that wayside detector systems
are installed and are operating along railroad tracks on which the
railroad operates and to ensure that the railroad and wayside
detector systems meet all of following standards:
(a) Each wayside detector system is properly installed,
maintained, repaired, and operational in accordance with sections
282 to 284 and the latest guidelines issued by the United States
Department of Transportation, the Federal Railroad Administration,
and the Association of American Railroads.
(b) An expired, nonworking, or outdated wayside detector
system or component part of a wayside detector system is promptly
removed and replaced with a new part or an entirely new system that
reflects the current best practices and standards of the industry.
(c) The distance between each wayside detector system is
appropriate when accounting for the requirements of sections 282 to
284, the natural terrain surrounding the railroad track on which
the railroad operates, and the safety of the trains, rolling stock,
on-track equipment, operators, passengers, and the individuals and
property in the vicinity of the railroad track so that if defects
are detected there is sufficient time to do all of the following:
(i) Respond to the alerts given by the wayside detector system.
(ii) Stop the train, rolling stock, or on-track equipment, if
necessary.
JJR S05151'25 (S-2) gcsk2y


(iii) Make all necessary repairs or, if repair is impossible at
the location, remove the component parts or equipment that has a
defect.
(d) The railroad has defined, written standards and training
for its employees pertaining to wayside detector system defect
alerts, the course of action that employees are required to take to
respond to an alert, and appropriate monitoring and responses by
the company if employees fail to take the required course of
action.
(2) If a railroad refuses to work or otherwise cooperate with
the office in good faith under this section, the office shall
investigate that railroad's safety practices and standards in
accordance with 49 CFR part 212. The office shall determine whether
the company appears to be in compliance with federal railroad
safety laws in accordance with 49 CFR part 209.
(3) If a railroad does not appear to be in compliance with the
applicable federal standards based on an investigation conducted
under subsection (2), not later than 60 days after the conclusion
of the investigation, the office shall make a report to the Federal
Railroad Administration detailing the results of the investigation
and recommend that the Federal Railroad Administration take
appropriate enforcement actions against the railroad for the safety
violations discovered through that investigation. The office shall
send a copy of the report to the governor, the senate majority
leader, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the
minority leaders of both the senate and the house of
representatives.
Sec. 282. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section,
any person responsible for installing a wayside detector system
JJR S05151'25 (S-2) gcsk2y


alongside or on a railroad track shall ensure that each wayside
detector system is located at the following distance along the
track from the nearest wayside detector system:
(a) For a class I carrier railroad, not more than 15 miles.
(b) For a class II carrier railroad or class III carrier
railroad, not more than 35 miles.
(2) If the natural terrain or any other reason does not allow
for the placement of a wayside detector system in compliance with
subsection (1)(a) or (b), the wayside detector system may be
located not more than an additional 5 miles from the nearest
wayside detector system than the maximum distance allowed under
subsection (1)(a) or (b).
(3) A class II carrier railroad or class III carrier railroad
must, before installing a wayside detector system further than the
maximum distance allowed under subsection (1)(a) or (b), submit to
the office a written explanation for the deviation.
Sec. 283. If a wayside detector system detects a defect in a
passing train, rolling stock, on-track equipment, or its component
equipment and parts, the operating crew must be immediately
notified of the defect.
Sec. 284. Sections 280 to 283 do not apply to a railroad track
owned or leased by a class II carrier railroad or class III carrier
railroad that has a speed limit of 25 miles per hour or less.
Sec. 285. (1) By not later than December 31, 2028, the office
shall complete a report on train derailments in this state using
statistics from the Federal Railroad Administration to identify
derailments due to bearing or axle failure that occurred during the
3 years preceding the effective date of the amendatory act that
added this section.
JJR S05151'25 (S-2) gcsk2y


(2) The office shall send a copy of the report to the
governor, the senate majority leader, the speaker of the house of
representatives, and the minority leaders of both the senate and
the house of representatives.
Final Page
JJR S05151'25 (S-2) gcsk2y